Washington statutes.
RCW 43.211.060

Use of 211 account moneys.

(1) WIN 211 shall study, design, implement, and support a statewide 211 system.

(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the 211 account include, but are not limited to:

(a) Creating a structure for a statewide 211 resources database that will meet the alliance for information and referral systems standards for information and referral systems databases and that will be integrated with local resources databases maintained by approved 211 service providers;

(b) Developing a statewide resources database for the 211 system;

(c) Maintaining public information available from state agencies, departments, and programs that provide health and human services for access by 211 service providers;

(d) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers for the design, development, and implementation of 211 for its 211 service area;

(e) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers to enable 211 service providers to provide 211 service on an ongoing basis; and

(f) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers to enable the provision of 211 services on a twenty-four-hour per day seven-day a week basis.

[ 2003 c 135 s 7.]